Washington statutes.
RCW 18.155.040

Secretary—Authority.

In addition to any other authority provided by law, the secretary shall have the following authority:

(1) To set administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees in accordance with RCW 43.70.250, 43.70.280, and 71.09.360;

(2) To establish forms necessary to administer this chapter;

(3) To issue a certificate or an affiliate certificate to any applicant who has met the education, training, and examination requirements for certification or an affiliate certification and deny a certificate to applicants who do not meet the minimum qualifications for certification or affiliate certification. Proceedings concerning the denial of certificates based on unprofessional conduct or impaired practice shall be governed by the uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW;

(4) To hire clerical, administrative, and investigative staff as needed to implement and administer this chapter and to hire individuals including those certified under this chapter to serve as examiners or consultants as necessary to implement and administer this chapter;

(5) To maintain the official department record of all applicants and certifications;

(6) To conduct a hearing on an appeal of a denial of a certificate on the applicant's failure to meet the minimum qualifications for certification. The hearing shall be conducted pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW;

(7) To issue subpoenas, statements of charges, statements of intent to deny certificates, and orders and to delegate in writing to a designee the authority to issue subpoenas, statements of charges, and statements of intent to deny certificates;

(8) To determine the minimum education, work experience, and training requirements for certification or affiliate certification, including but not limited to approval of educational programs;

(9) To prepare and administer or approve the preparation and administration of examinations for certification;

(10) To establish by rule the procedure for appeal of an examination failure;

(11) To adopt rules implementing a continuing competency program;

(12) To adopt rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW as necessary to implement this chapter.

[ 2020 c 266 s 7; 2004 c 38 s 5; 1996 c 191 s 86; 1990 c 3 s 804.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2004 c 38: See note following RCW 18.155.075.